Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Article 3. Congressional Ballot Access Limitation Act.

Editor’s notes. —

The U.S. Supreme Court has found provisions similar to AS

15.30.150

—

15.30.190

to be unconstitutional. U.S. Term limits, Inc. v. Thornton, 514 U.S. 779, 131 L. Ed. 2d 881, 115 S. Ct. 1842 (1995).

Sec. 15.30.150.
Short title.

AS

15.30.150

—

15.30.190

shall be known and may be cited as “The Alaska Congressional Ballot Access Limitation Act of 1993.”

History.

(§ 1 1994 Ballot Measure No. 4)

Sec. 15.30.160.
Findings and declarations.

The people of the State of Alaska hereby find and declare as follows:

federal officeholders who remain in office for extended periods of time become preoccupied with their own reelection and for that reason devote more effort to campaigning for their office than making legislative decisions for the benefit of the people of Alaska;

federal officeholders have become to closely aligned with the special interest groups who provide contributions and support for their reelection campaigns, give them special favors, and lobby the House of Representatives and Senate for special interest legislation, all of which create corruption or the appearance of corruption of the legislative system;

entrenched incumbency has discouraged qualified citizens from seeking office and has led to a lack of competitiveness and a decline in robust debate on issues of importance to the people of Alaska;

due to the appearance of corruption and the lack of competition for the legislative seats held by the entrenched incumbents, there has been a reduction in voter participation which is counter-productive in a representative democracy;

the citizens of Alaska have a compelling interest in preventing corruption and the appearance of corruption by limiting the number of terms which any Senator or Representative representing the people of this state may serve;

the citizens of Alaska have a compelling interest in preserving the integrity of the ballot by promoting competitive elections and limiting the influence of special interests upon entrenched incumbent legislators;

the citizens of Alaska have a compelling interest in voting for the candidate or candidates of their choice, and in standing for and holding elective office, and in preventing the perpetual monopolization of elective offices by incumbents;

the citizens of Alaska have a compelling interest in extending the equal protection of the laws by ensuring that more of the people of this state have an equal opportunity to stand for and hold elective office.

History.

(§ 2 1994 Ballot Measure No. 4)

Sec. 15.30.170.
Purpose and intent.

The purpose and intent in enacting AS

15.30.150

—

15.30.190

is to:

promote, protect, and defend the compelling interest of the citizens of this state in preventing corruption and the appearance of corruption among the federal legislative representatives of this state by limiting the number of terms in which any Senator or Representative may hold office;

promote, protect, and defend the compelling interest of the citizens of this state in preserving the integrity of the ballot by ensuring, to the greatest extent permitted by law, competitive elections without the corrupting influence of special interests upon entrenched incumbents;

promote, protect and defend the rights of the citizens of this state, guaranteed by the First Amendment of the United States Constitution, to vote for the candidates of their choice, and to stand for and hold elective office, by curtailing the effects of entrenched incumbency and freely permitting write-in candidacies;

promote, protect, and defend the rights of the citizens of this state for equal protection of the laws, guaranteed by the Fourteenth Amendment to the United States Constitution, by giving more of the citizens of this state the opportunity to stand for and hold elective office;

ensure that when this measure does become operative, it is given the maximum retrospective effect permitted by applicable law in order to prevent the perpetuation of a professional, federal office-seeking and office-holding class.

History.

(§ 3 1994 Ballot Measure No. 4)

Sec. 15.30.180.
Federal legislative candidates; ballot access.

Subsections (b) and (c) of this section shall take effect only when twenty-four (24) states, not including this state, have enacted and have in simultaneous effect statutes, state constitutional provisions, ordinances and other enactments having the force and effect of law, the operative dates of which may be contingent upon the enactment of similar statutes, constitutional provisions, ordinances or other enactments in any number of other states, which limit either ballot access of persons seeking federal legislative office, or the number of terms or years of federal legislative office a person may hold, or both, based upon a person’s length of service in federal legislative office; provided, however, that when subsections (b) and (c) of this section have once taken effect, the subsequent repeal, amendment, deletion by means of a sunset provision, or judicial determination of unconstitutionality or invalidity of another state’s statute, state constitutional provision, ordinance other enactment ineffective or void, shall not affect the validity or effectiveness of subsections (b) and (c) of this section, which shall remain in full force and effect until repealed or otherwise rendered ineffective under the law of this state.

A person is not eligible to place or to have the person’s name placed upon the ballot for election to the United States House of Representatives if, by the end of the then current term of office, the person will have served, or but for resignation would have served, as a member of the United States House of Representatives representing any portion or district of the State of Alaska during six or more of the previous twelve years.

A person is not eligible to place or to have the person’s name placed upon the ballot for election to the United States Senate if, by the end of the then current term of office, the person will have served, or but for resignation would have served, as a member of the United States Senate representing any portion or district of the State of Alaska during twelve or more of the previous eighteen years.

The provisions of this section shall, to the maximum extent permitted by applicable law, be interpreted as having retrospective effect from and after the date of its enactment upon any member of the United States House of Representatives or United States Senate elected at the election held on November 8, 1994, or at any election held thereafter; provided, however, that years of service completed during a term of office which commenced prior to November 8, 1994 may not be included in determining previous years of service for the purposes of subsections (b) or (c) of this section.

Nothing in AS

15.30.100

—

15.30.190

shall be construed as preventing or prohibiting any qualified voter of this state from casting a ballot for any person by writing the name of that person on the ballot, or from having such a ballot counted or tabulated, nor shall any provision of AS

15.30.100

—15.30.190 be construed as preventing or prohibiting any person from standing or campaigning for any elective office by means of a write-in campaign.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as preventing or prohibiting the name of any person from appearing on the ballot at any direct primary or general election unless that person is specifically prohibited from doing so by the provisions of this section and to that end any such prohibiting provisions shall be strictly construed.

The members of the United States House of Representatives and United States Senate representing any district or portion of Alaska are instructed to use their best efforts to attain such a limitation on terms nationwide.

AS

15.30.150

—

15.30.190

shall take effect and be applicable to federal legislative candidates whose terms of office begin on or after January 1, 1995. Service prior to January 1, 1995 shall not be counted for the purpose of AS

15.30.150

—15.30.190. In the event of conflict with (a) of this section, the provisions under (a) shall govern.

History.

(§ 4 1994 Ballot Measure No. 4)

Sec. 15.30.190.
Severability.

If any provision, subsection, part of the subsection, or clause of AS

15.30.150

—

15.30.190

shall be held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be void, invalid, or unconstitutional for any reason, the remaining provisions of AS

15.30.150

—

15.30.190

shall not be affected, and to this end the provisions of AS 15.30.150 — 15.30.190 are severable.

History.

(§ 5 1994 Ballot Measure No. 4)